apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enjoy__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ides</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="approach__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="admit__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rot__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ted</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ting</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="abet"><i>abet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="admit"><i>admit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lavish"><i>lavish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bless"><i>bless</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bury"><i>bur</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="quarry"><i>quarr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chat"><i>chat</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="classify"><i>classif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="commit"><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="commit suicide"><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/><p><l><b/>suicide</l><r><g><b/>suicide</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="convey"><i>convey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="delay"><i>delay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="deny"><i>den</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="deploy"><i>deploy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="gross"><i>gross</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="destroy"><i>destroy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="dismay"><i>dismay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="display"><i>display</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="embarrass"><i>embarrass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="employ"><i>employ</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="envy"><i>env</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="fry"><i>fr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="gloss"><i>gloss</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="intensify"><i>intensif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="knit"><i>knit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lay" a="doriua"><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mass"><i>mass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="modify"><i>modif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="obey"><i>obey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="omit"><i>omit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pay"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="photocopy"><i>photocop</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pray"><i>pray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="preach"><i>preach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="reach for"><i>reach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="regret"><i>regret</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="remit"><i>remit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="reply"><i>repl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="video"><i>video</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="say"><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="simplify"><i>simplif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="submit"><i>submit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="suppress"><i>suppress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="survey"><i>survey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spray"><i>spray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="key"><i>key</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="essay"><i>essay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="testify"><i>testif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="transmit"><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="vary"><i>var</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="wash"><i>wash</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="jockey"><i>jockey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nullify"><i>nullif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="magnify"><i>magnif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slay"><i>slay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tally"><i>tall</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tidy"><i>tid</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="parry"><i>parr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trespass"><i>trespass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="volley"><i>volley</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flash"><i>flash</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blush"><i>blush</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flinch"><i>flinch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slot"><i>slot</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slit"><i>slit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bash"><i>bash</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ambush"><i>ambush</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="annoy" a="ebenimeli"><i>annoy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pay cash"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>cash</l><r><g><b/>cash</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="mortify"><i>mortif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="punch"><i>punch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>     </e>
<e lm="portray"><i>portray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="rot"><i>rot</i><par n="rot__vblex"/>    </e>
